Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.755

Provisions applicable to plan 2.

RCW 41.32.760 through 41.32.825 shall apply only to plan 2 members.

[ 1992 c 72 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 293: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect October 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 23.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 293: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 22.]

Legislative direction and placement—1977 ex.s. c 293: "Sections 1 through 17 of this 1977 amendatory act shall be added to chapter 41.32 RCW and shall be codified as consecutive sections of the Revised Code of Washington within such chapter." [ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 21.]

Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: "Section headings used in this 1977 amendatory act shall not constitute any part of the law." [ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 20.]